en: Dehydrated mixed vegetables soup
fr: Soupe aux légumes déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od miješanog povrća
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su įvairiomis daržovėmis

en: Reheatable vegetable soups
lt: Pašildomos daržovių sriubos

en: Minestrone soups
fr: Soupes minestrone
he: מרקי מינסטרונה
hr: Minestrone juhe
ja: ミネストローネ
lt: Minestrone sriubos

en: Reheatable minestrone soup
fr: Soupe minestrone à réchauffer
he: מרק מינסטרונה לחימום חוזר
hr: Podgrijava minestrone juha
lt: Pašildomos minestrone sriubos

en: Lentil soups, Lentils soup, Soups of lentils
da: Linsesupper
de: Linsensuppen
fr: Soupes de lentilles, Soupe aux lentilles
he: מרקי עדשים, מרק עדשים
hr: Juhe od leće
lt: Lęšių sriubos, sriubos su lęšiais, Pašildomos lęšių sriubos
nl: Linzensoepen
pt: Sopas de lentilhas
sv: Linssoppor

en: Pea soups, Peas soup
de: Erbsensuppen
nb: Ertesupper
sv: Ärtsoppor, Ärtsoppa

en: Green pea soups, Green peas soups
sv: Grön ärtsoppor

en: Split pea soups, Split peas soup
fr: Soupe aux pois cassés
hr: Juha od graška
lt: Skaldytų žirnelių sriubos
pl: Grochówka

en: Leek and potato soups, Leek and potato soup, Potato and leek soups
da: Porre- og kartoffelsupper, Kartoffel- og porresupper
fi: Peruna- ja purjokeitto
fr: Soupe aux poireaux et aux pommes de terre
hr: Juha od poriluka i krumpira
lt: Porų ir bulvių sriubos
nb: Potet og purre supper
sv: Potatis och purjolökssoppor

en: Canned leek and potato soups, Canned potato and leek soups
da: Porre- og kartoffelsupper på dåse, Kartoffel- og porresupper på dåse
sv: Potatis och purjolökssoppor på burk

en: Dehydrated leek and potato soups, Dehydrated leek and potato soup
fr: Soupe aux poireaux et pommes de terre déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od poriluka i krumpira
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su bulvėmis ir porais

en: Tomato soups
da: Tomatsupper
de: Tomatensuppen, Paradeissuppen
es: Sopas de tomate
fi: tomaattikeitot
fr: soupes de tomate
he: מרקי עגבניות, מרק עגבניות
hr: paradajz juha
it: zuppa di pomodoro
ja: トマトスープ
lt: Pomidorų sriubos
nl: Tomatensoepen, Tomatensoep
pt: Sopas de tomate
sv: Tomatsoppor
tr: Domates çorbası
zh: 番茄汤

en: Zucchini soups
es: Sopas De Calabacín
fr: Soupes aux courgettes
hr: Juhe od tikvica
lt: Sriubos su cukinija
nl: Courgettesoep

en: Bean soups
da: Bønnesupper
hr: Juhe od graha
lt: Žirnių sriuba, Sriubos su žirniais
nl: Bonensoepen
pl: Zupy z fasoli, Zupy z fasolą

es: Sopa de habas
fr: Soupe de fèves

en: Carrot soups
de: Karottensuppe, Möhrensuppe
fr: Soupes de carottes
he: מרקי גזר, מרק גזר, מרקי גזרים
hr: Juhe od mrkve
lt: Sriubos su morkomis, Pašildomos morkų sriubos, morkų sriuba
nl: Wortelsoepen
pt: Sopas de cenoura

en: Reheatable carrot soups
fr: Soupe à la carotte à réchauffer

en: Dehydrated carrot soups
de: Dehydrierte Karottensuppen
es: Sopas de zanahoria deshidratadas
fr: Soupes de carottes déshydratées
hr: Dehidrirane juhe od mrkve
it: Zuppe di carote disidratate
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su morkomis
nl: Gedehydrateerde wortelsoepen

en: Pumpkin soups
da: Græskarsupper
de: Kürbissuppen
fr: Soupes de potiron
hr: Juhe od bundeve
it: Zuppe di zucca
ja: かぼちゃスープ
lt: Sriubos su moliūgais, moliūgų sriubos
nl: Pompoensoepen

en: Reheatable pumpkin soups
fr: Soupes au potiron à réchauffer
hr: Juhe od bundeve koje se mogu podgrijati
lt: Pašildomos moliūgų sriubos